Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.540

Withdrawal on dissolution or conversion.

(1) A registered foreign entity that has dissolved and completed winding up or has converted to a domestic or foreign person not subject to this chapter shall deliver a statement of withdrawal to the secretary of state for filing. The statement must be executed by the dissolved or converted entity and state:

(a) In the case of a foreign entity that has completed winding up:

(i) Its name and jurisdiction of formation; and

(ii) That the foreign entity surrenders its registration to do business in this state; and

(b) In the case of a foreign entity that has converted to a domestic or foreign person not subject to chapter 176, Laws of 2015:

(i) The name of the converting foreign entity and its jurisdiction of formation;

(ii) The type of person to which it has converted and its jurisdiction of formation;

(iii) That it surrenders its registration to do business in this state and revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf; and

(iv) A mailing address to which service of process may be made under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) After a withdrawal is effective under this section, service of process in any action or proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign entity was registered to do business in this state may be made pursuant to RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1509.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.